Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-278
Stay of proceedings.

(MBCA 7.43) If the corporation commences
an inquiry into the allegations made in the demand or complaint, the court
may stay any derivative proceeding for such period as the court deems appropriate.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 78.